Maryland, session 2025, HB0456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–117.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHILD” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS.
(3) (I) “NEGLECT” MEANS THE LEAVING OF A CHILD UNATTENDED
OR OTHER FAILURE TO GIVE PROPER CARE AND ATTENTION TO A CHILD BY ANY
PARENT OR OTHER PERSON WHO HAS PERMANENT OR TEMPORARY CARE OR
CUSTODY OR RESPONSIBILITY FOR SUPERVISION OF THE CHILD UNDER
CIRCUMSTANCES THAT INDICATE:
1. THAT THE CHILD’S HEALTH OR WELFARE IS HARMED
OR PLACED AT SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF HARM; OR
2. MENTAL INJURY TO THE CHILD OR A SUBSTANTIAL
RISK OF MENTAL INJURY.
(II) “NEGLECT” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. THE SEXUAL ABUSE OF A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN §
5–117 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR THE PHYSICAL INJURY OF A CHILD BY ACCIDENTAL
MEANS; OR
2. THE FAILURE TO PROVIDE NECESSARY ASSISTANCE
AND RESOURCES FOR THE PHYSICAL NEEDS OR MENTAL HEALTH OF A CHILD WHEN

HOUSE BILL 456 3
THE FAILURE IS DUE SOLELY TO A LACK OF FINANCIAL RESOURCES OR
HOMELESSNESS.
(4) (I) “NONSEXUAL ABUSE” MEANS THE PHYSICAL OR MENTAL
INJURY OF A CHILD UNDER CIRCUMSTANCES THAT INDICATE THAT THE CHILD’S
HEALTH OR WELFARE IS HARMED OR AT SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF BEING HARMED BY:
1. A PARENT;
2. A HOUSEHOLD MEMBER OR FAMILY MEMBER;
3. A PERSON WHO HAS PERMANENT OR TEMPORARY
CARE OR CUSTODY OF THE CHILD;
4. A PERSON WHO HAS RESPONSIBILITY FOR
SUPERVISION OF THE CHILD; OR
5. A PERSON WHO, BECAUSE OF THE PERSON’S
POSITION OR OCCUPATION, EXERCISES AUTHORITY OVER THE CHILD.
(II) “NONSEXUAL ABUSE” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE SEXUAL
ABUSE OF A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN § 5–117 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR THE PHYSICAL
INJURY OF A CHILD BY ACCIDENTAL MEANS.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE ALLEGED VICTIM OF
NONSEXUAL ABUSE OR NEGLECT IS DECEASED AT THE COMMENCEMENT OF AN
ACTION FOR DAMAGES BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY TIME LIMITATION UNDER A STATUTE OF
LIMITATIONS, A STATUTE OF REPOSE, THE MARYLAND TORT CLAIMS ACT, THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT TORT CLAIMS ACT, OR ANY OTHER LAW, AN ACTION FOR
DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF AN ALLEGED INCIDENT OR INCIDENTS OF NONSEXUAL
ABUSE OR NEGLECT THAT OCCURRED WHILE THE VICTIM WAS A CHILD SHALL BE
FILED WITHIN THE LATER OF:
(1) 20 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE VICTIM REACHED THE AGE
OF 18 YEARS; OR
(2) 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE DEFENDANT IS CONVICTED
OF A CRIME RELATING TO THE ALLEGED INCIDENT OR INCIDENTS UNDER:
(I) § 3–601 OR § 6–602.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR

HOUSE BILL 456
(II) THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE OR THE UNITED STATES
THAT WOULD BE A CRIME UNDER § 3–601 OR § 6–602.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN §§ 5–303 AND 5–518 OF THIS TITLE AND §
12–104 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
NONECONOMIC DAMAGES THAT MAY BE AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION TO A
SINGLE CLAIMANT IN AN ACTION AGAINST A SINGLE DEFENDANT FOR INJURIES
ARISING FROM AN INCIDENT OR OCCURRENCE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN BARRED BY
A TIME LIMITATION BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, MAY NOT EXCEED $1,500,000.
5–303.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection, the
liability of a local government may not exceed $400,000 per an individual claim, and
$800,000 per total claims that arise from the same occurrence for damages resulting from
tortious acts or omissions, or liability arising under subsection (b) of this section and
indemnification under subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The limits on liability provided under paragraph (1) of this subsection
do not include interest accrued on a judgment.
(3) If the liability of a local government arises from intentional tortious acts
or omissions or a violation of a constitutional right committed by a law enforcement officer,
the following limits on liability apply:
(i) Subject to item (ii) of this paragraph, the combined award for
both economic and noneconomic damages may not exceed a total of $890,000 for all claims
arising out of the same incident or occurrence, regardless of the number of claimants or
beneficiaries who share in the award; and
(ii) In a wrongful death action in which there are two or more
claimants or beneficiaries, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed 150% of the
limitation established under item (i) of this paragraph, regardless of the number of
claimants or beneficiaries who share in the award.
(4) If the liability of a local government arises from a claim of sexual abuse,
as defined in § 5–117 of this title, OR NONSEXUAL ABUSE OR NEGLECT, AS DEFINED IN
§ 5–117.1 OF THIS TITLE, the liability may not exceed $890,000 to a single claimant for
injuries arising from an incident or occurrence.
5–518.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 456 5
(2) “Compensation” does not include actual and necessary expenses that
are incurred by a volunteer in connection with the services provided or duties performed by
the volunteer for a county board of education, and that are reimbursed to the volunteer or
otherwise paid.
(3) “County board employee” means:
(i) Any employee whose compensation is paid in whole or in part by
a county board of education; or
(ii) A student teacher.
(4) “County board member” means a duly elected or appointed member of
a county board of education.
(5) “Volunteer” means an individual who, at the request of the county
board and under its control and direction, provides services or performs duties for the
county board without compensation.
(b) A county board of education, described under Title 4, Subtitle 1 of the
Education Article, may raise the defense of sovereign immunity to:
(1) Any amount claimed above the limit of its insurance policy; or
(2) If self–insured or a member of a pool described under § 4–105(c)(1)(ii)
of the Education Article:
(i) Except as provided in item (ii) of this item, any amount above
$400,000; or
(ii) If the liability of the county board of education arises from a
claim of sexual abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of this title, OR NONSEXUAL ABUSE OR
NEGLECT, AS DEFINED IN § 5–117.1 OF THIS TITLE, any amount above $890,000 to a
single claimant for claims arising from an incident or occurrence.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a county board
of education may not raise the defense of sovereign immunity to any claim of $400,000 or
less.
(2) If liability of a county board of education arises under a claim of sexual
abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of this title, OR NONSEXUAL ABUSE OR NEGLECT, AS
DEFINED IN § 5–117.1 OF THIS TITLE, the liability may not exceed $890,000 to a single
claimant for injuries arising from an incident or occurrence.
12–303.

HOUSE BILL 456
A party may appeal from any of the following interlocutory orders entered by a circuit
court in a civil case:
(1) An order entered with regard to the possession of property with which
the action is concerned or with reference to the receipt or charging of the income, interest,
or dividends therefrom, or the refusal to modify, dissolve, or discharge such an order;
(2) An order granting or denying a motion to quash a writ of attachment;
and
(3) An order:
(i) Granting or dissolving an injunction, but if the appeal is from an
order granting an injunction, only if the appellant has first filed his answer in the cause;
(ii) Refusing to dissolve an injunction, but only if the appellant has
first filed his answer in the cause;
(iii) Refusing to grant an injunction; and the right of appeal is not
prejudiced by the filing of an answer to the bill of complaint or petition for an injunction on
behalf of any opposing party, nor by the taking of depositions in reference to the allegations
of the bill of complaint to be read on the hearing of the application for an injunction;
(iv) Appointing a receiver but only if the appellant has first filed his
answer in the cause;
(v) For the sale, conveyance, or delivery of real or personal property
or the payment of money, or the refusal to rescind or discharge such an order, unless the
delivery or payment is directed to be made to a receiver appointed by the court;
(vi) Determining a question of right between the parties and
directing an account to be stated on the principle of such determination;
(vii) Requiring bond from a person to whom the distribution or
delivery of property is directed, or withholding distribution or delivery and ordering the
retention or accumulation of property by the fiduciary or its transfer to a trustee or receiver,
or deferring the passage of the court’s decree in an action under Title 10, Chapter 600 of
the Maryland Rules;
(viii) Deciding any question in an insolvency proceeding brought
under Title 15, Subtitle 1 of the Commercial Law Article;
(ix) Granting a petition to stay arbitration pursuant to § 3–208 of this
article;
(x) Depriving a parent, grandparent, or natural guardian of the care
and custody of his child, or changing the terms of such an order;

HOUSE BILL 456 7
(xi) Denying immunity asserted under § 5–525 or § 5–526 of this
article; and
(xii) Denying a motion to dismiss a claim filed under § 5–117 OR §
5–117.1 of this article if the motion is based on a defense that the applicable statute of
limitations or statute of repose bars the claim and any legislative action reviving the claim
is unconstitutional.
Article – Education
4–105.
(a) (1) Each county board shall carry comprehensive liability insurance to
protect the board and its agents and employees.
(2) The purchase of insurance in accordance with paragraph (1) of this
subsection is a valid educational expense.
(b) (1) The State Board shall establish standards for these insurance policies,
including a minimum liability coverage of not less than:
(i) $890,000 for each occurrence for claims of sexual abuse made
under § 5–117 of the Courts Article OR CLAIMS OF NONSEXUAL ABUSE OR NEGLECT
MADE UNDER § 5–117.1 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; and
(ii) $400,000 for each occurrence for all other claims.
(2) The policies purchased under this section shall meet these standards.
(c) (1) A county board complies with this section if it:
(i) Is individually self–insured for at least $890,000 for each
occurrence under the rules and regulations adopted by the State Insurance Commissioner;
or
(ii) Pools with other public entities for the purpose of self–insuring
property or casualty risks under Title 19, Subtitle 6 of the Insurance Article.
(2) A county board that elects to self–insure individually under this
subsection periodically shall file with the State Insurance Commissioner, in writing, the
terms and conditions of the self–insurance.
(3) The terms and conditions of this individual self–insurance:
(i) Are subject to the approval of the State Insurance Commissioner;
and

HOUSE BILL 456
(ii) Shall conform with the terms and conditions of comprehensive
liability insurance policies available in the private market.
(d) A county board shall have the immunity from liability described under §
5–518 of the Courts and Judicial Proceedings Article.
Article – State Government
12–104.
(a) (1) Subject to the exclusions and limitations in this subtitle and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the immunity of the State and of its units is
waived as to a tort action, in a court of the State, to the extent provided under paragraph
(2) of this subsection.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, the liability of the State and its units may not exceed $400,000 to a single
claimant for injuries arising from a single incident or occurrence.
(ii) If liability of the State or its units arises from intentional tortious
acts or omissions or a violation of a constitutional right committed by a law enforcement
officer, the following limits on liability shall apply:
1. subject to item 2 of this subparagraph, the combined
award for both economic and noneconomic damages may not exceed a total of $890,000 for
all claims arising out of the same incident or occurrence, regardless of the number of
claimants or beneficiaries who share in the award; and
2. in a wrongful death action in which there are two or more
claimants or beneficiaries, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed 150% of the
limitation established under item 1 of this item, regardless of the number of claimants or
beneficiaries who share in the award.
(iii) If liability of the State or its units arises under a claim of sexual
abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of the Courts Article, OR NONSEXUAL ABUSE OR NEGLECT,
AS DEFINED IN § 5–117.1 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE, the liability may not exceed
$890,000 to a single claimant for injuries arising from an incident or occurrence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply both prospectively and retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect
any action that was barred by the application of the period of limitations applicable before
October 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other

HOUSE BILL 456 9
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.